Mississippi, session 2026, HB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "2026 Mississippi YouthBuild Pilot Program Act." SECTION 2. (1)  There is created the Mississippi YouthBuild Pilot Program, the purpose of which is to establish a YouthBuild program in conjunction with a community or junior college in different regions of the state in order to assess the potential impact the program may have on helping low income young adults rebuild their lives and the communities in which they live.  The pilot program initially will consist of two (2) YouthBuild programs, one to be sponsored and managed by Coahoma Community College and one to be sponsored and managed by Jones County Junior College. (2)  The specific purposes of the YouthBuild Pilot Program are as follows: (a)  To enable economically disadvantaged youth, especially youth who have not finished high school, to obtain the education, job skills training, personal counseling, leadership development skills training, job placement assistance and long-term follow-up services necessary for them to achieve permanent economic self-sufficiency, while at the same time providing valuable community service that addresses urgent community needs, including the demand for affordable housing and the need for young role models and mentors for younger teenagers and children; (b)  To provide communities the opportunity to establish or rebuild neighborhood stability in economically depressed and low income areas, as well as historic areas requiring restoration or preservation, while providing economically disadvantaged youth and youth who have not finished high school an opportunity for meaningful participation in society; (c)  To allow communities to expand the supply of affordable housing for homeless and other low income individuals by utilizing the energies and talents of economically disadvantaged youth and young people who have not finished high school; (d)  To foster the development of leadership skills and a commitment to community development among youth; and (e)  To determine the effectiveness of the YouthBuild programs established under this act in achieving the purposes set forth in this subsection and to assess the desirability and feasibility of establishing additional YouthBuild programs in conjunction with community and junior colleges throughout the state. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "College" means Coahoma Community College and Jones County Junior College. (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Human Services. (c)  "Department of Labor" means the United States Department of Labor. (d) "YouthBuild" means the community-based pre-apprenticeship program that provides job training and educational opportunities for at-risk youth who have dropped out of high school which is administered by the Division of Youth Services within the Employment and Training Administration's Office Of Workforce Investment at the Department of Labor. SECTION 4. (1)  Coahoma Community College and Jones County Junior College shall each apply to the Department of Labor for grant funding for the support of a YouthBuild program.  In order for each site to secure the maximum available grant of One Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,100,000.00) from the Department of Labor, the Division of Family and Children's Services of the Department of Human Services shall provide to each college, from any funds available to the department which are not allocated otherwise, the minimally required twenty-five percent (25%) matching nonfederal funds. (2)  As a condition of receiving matching funds from the department, funding for the support of each YouthBuild program established under this act must be used in a manner consistent with the terms of the grant from the Department of Labor and at a minimum, must cover the costs of the following services: (a)  Acquisition or rehabilitation, or both, or construction of housing and related facilities to be used for the purpose of providing home ownership for disadvantaged persons, residential housing for homeless individuals and low income families or transitional housing for persons who are homeless, disabled, ill or deinstitutionalized or who have special needs, and rehabilitation or construction of community facilities by nonprofit or public agencies. (b)  Integrated education and job skills training services and activities, with fifty percent (50%) of students' time in the program devoted to classroom-based instruction, counseling and leadership development instruction and the remaining fifty percent (50%) of students' time spent in experimental training on the construction site.  The programs must include, at a minimum, the following elements: (i)  An education component that includes basic skills instruction, secondary education services and other activities designed to lead to the attainment of a high school diploma or its equivalent.  The curriculum for this component must include math, language arts, vocational education, life skills training, social studies related to the cultural and community history of the students, leadership skills and other topics at the discretion of the program.  Bilingual services must be available for individuals with limited English proficiency.  The desired minimum teacher to student ratio is one (1) teacher for every twelve (12) students. (ii)  A work experience and skills training apprenticeship program component that includes the construction and rehabilitation activities described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.  The process of construction must be coupled with skills training and with close onsite supervision by experienced trainers.  The curriculum for this component must contain a set of locally agreed upon skills and competencies that are systematically taught, with a student's mastery assessed individually on a regular, ongoing basis.  Safety skills must be taught at the outset.  The desired trainer to student ratio is one (1) trainer for every seven (7) students.  The work experience and skills training component must be coordinated to the maximum extent feasible with pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship programs. (iii)  Assistance in attaining postsecondary education and required financial aid, which must be made available to participants before graduation. (c)  Counseling services designed to assist participants in positively participating in society, which should include all of the following, if necessary:  outreach, assessment and orientation; individual and peer counseling; life skills training; drug and alcohol abuse education and prevention; and referral to appropriate drug rehabilitation, medical, mental health, legal, housing and other services and resources in the community.  The desired counselor to participant ratio is one (1) counselor for every twenty-four (24) students. (d)  Leadership development training that provides participants with meaningful opportunities to develop leadership skills such as decision making, problem solving and negotiating.  The program also must encourage participants to develop strong peer group ties that support their mutual pursuit of skills and values.  Each program must establish a youth council in which participants are afforded opportunities to develop public speaking and negotiating skills and to participate in management and policy making in specific aspects of the program. (e)  A training subsidy, living allowance or stipend that is no less than the minimum wage, which must be provided to program participants for the time spent at the work site in construction training.  For those participants who receive public assistance, this training subsidy, living allowance or stipend will not affect their housing benefits, medical benefits, child care benefits or food stamp benefits.  Stipends and wages may be distributed in a manner that offers incentives for good performance. (3)  Full time participation in a YouthBuild program established under this act must be offered for a period of not less than six (6) months and not more than twenty-four (24) months. (4)  A concentrated effort must be made to find construction, construction-related and nonconstruction jobs for all graduates of the program who have performed well.  The skills training curriculum must provide participants with basic preparation for seeking and maintaining a job.  Follow-up counseling and assistance in job seeking must be provided to participants for twelve (12) months following graduation from the program. (5)  If a program created under this act serves twenty-four (24) trainees, the community or junior college shall employ a fulltime director to be responsible for the coordination of all aspects of the YouthBuild program. SECTION 5. Subject to any restrictions or requirements established by the Department of Labor, funding for the YouthBuild program may be used to cover the costs of other eligible activities, including the following: (a)  Legal fees for housing acquisition. (b)  Administrative costs of the community or junior college, which may not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the amount of funding provided. (c)  Defraying costs of the ongoing training and technical assistance needs of the recipients which are related to developing and carrying out the YouthBuild program.  The community or junior college may enter into a contract with YouthBuild USA for assistance in providing training and technical assistance to, or in the management, supervision and coordination of, the YouthBuild program. SECTION 6.  To be eligible to participate in a YouthBuild program, an individual must be at least sixteen (16) but no more than twenty-four (24) years of age and must be economically disadvantaged, as defined in 29 USCS Section 1508, and except as otherwise provided in this section, must be a member of one (1) of the following groups: (a)  Persons who are not attending any school and have not received a high school diploma or its equivalent. (b)  Persons enrolled in a traditional or alternative school setting or a GED program who are in danger of dropping out of school. (c)  Very low income persons. Up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the participants in the program may be individuals who do not meet the requirements of paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this section but who have educational needs despite the attainment of a high school diploma. SECTION 7. Before January 1, 2029, the Division of Family and Children's Services within the Department of Human Services shall submit a report to the House of Representatives and the Senate on the YouthBuild Pilot Program.  The report must include, but need not be limited to, the following: (a)  A description of the experience of Coahoma Community College and Jones County Junior College in operating a YouthBuild program, with specific information relating to the nature and number of housing rehabilitation or construction projects undertaken and the experience of youth who participated in the program; (b)  A description of the opportunities for youth leadership development and employment training afforded by the YouthBuild program and data reflecting the number of participants who enrolled in the program, along with the rate of completion; (c)  A description of the educational and job training activities, work opportunities and other services provided to program participants, along with specific data on the educational attainments achieved by participants; (d)  A description of the manner in which eligible youths were recruited and selected, including a description of the arrangements that were made with community-based organizations, local education agencies, public assistance agencies, the courts of jurisdiction for status and youth offenders, shelters for homeless individuals and other agencies that serve homeless youth, foster care agencies, and other appropriate public and private agencies; (e)  A description of any special efforts that were undertaken to recruit eligible young women (including young women with dependent children) with appropriate supports, especially child care; (f)  A description of how each YouthBuild program coordinated, when appropriate, with other federal, state or local activities and activities conducted by public schools, crime prevention programs, vocational, adult and bilingual education programs and job training; (g)  Data reflecting the sufficiency of the number of adequately trained supervisory personnel in the YouthBuild program; (h)  A description of any relationship the YouthBuild program established with local apprenticeship programs; (i)  A description of the activities that were undertaken to develop the leadership skills of participants, including their role in decision making; (j)  A detailed financial report and a description of the systems of fiscal controls and auditing and accountability procedures that were used to ensure fiscal soundness; (k)  A description of any contracts or other arrangements entered into between the college and other agencies and entities, including all in-kind donations and grants from both public and private entities which were received to augment YouthBuild grant funding; and (l)  A review of the overall effectiveness of the YouthBuild programs and recommendations on the desirability and feasibility of establishing additional YouthBuild programs at community and junior colleges throughout the state. SECTION 8.  Section 43-26-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-26-1.  (1)  There is created a Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services. (2)  The Chief Administrative Officer of the Department of Child Protection Services shall be the Commissioner of Child Protection Services who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall possess the following qualifications: (a)  A bachelor's degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and ten (10) years' experience in management, public administration, finance or accounting; or (b)  A master's or doctoral degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and five (5) years' experience in management, public administration, finance, law or accounting. (3)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall provide the services authorized by law to every individual determined to be eligible therefor, and in carrying out the purposes of the department, the commissioner is authorized: (a)  To formulate the policy of the department regarding child welfare services within the jurisdiction of the department; (b)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department's jurisdiction; (c)  To apply for, receive and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, devises, bequests or funds from any other source; (d)  To enter into and execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the programs of the department; and (e)  To discharge such other duties, responsibilities, and powers as are necessary to implement the programs of the department. (4)  The commissioner shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Child Protection Services, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law. (5)  The commissioner shall appoint heads of offices, bureaus, and divisions, as defined in Section 7-17-11, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The salary and compensation of such office, bureau and division heads shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Personnel Board. The commissioner shall have the authority to organize offices as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department. (6)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall be responsible for the development, execution, and provision of services in the following areas: (a)  Protective services for children; (b)  Foster care; (c)  Adoption services; (d)  Special services; (e)  Interstate compact; (f)  Licensure; (g)  Prevention services; and (h)  Such other services as may be designated.  Services enumerated under Section 43-15-13 et seq., for the foster care program shall be provided by qualified staff with appropriate case loads. (7)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To provide basic services and assistance statewide to needy and disadvantaged individuals and families; (b)  To promote integration of the many services and programs within its jurisdiction at the client level thus improving the efficiency and effectiveness of service delivery and providing easier access to clients; (c)  To employ personnel and expend funds appropriated to the department to carry out the duties and responsibilities assigned to the department by law; (d)  To fingerprint and conduct a background investigation on every employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer: (i)  Who has direct access to clients of the department who are children or vulnerable adults; (ii)  Who is in a position of fiduciary responsibility; (iii)  Who is in a position with access to Federal Tax Information (FTI); or (iv)  Who is otherwise required by federal law or regulations to undergo a background investigation. Every such employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer shall provide a valid current social security number and/or driver's license number, which shall be furnished to conduct the background investigation for determination as to good moral character and to ensure that no person placed in any position referenced in this paragraph (d) has a felony conviction that would prevent employment or access to Federal Tax Information according to department policy.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a fingerprint-based national criminal history record check.  The department shall be the recipient of the results of any background investigation and/or criminal history record check performed in accordance with this paragraph; (e)  To establish and maintain programs not inconsistent with the terms of this chapter and the rules, regulations and policies of the Department of Child Protection Services, and publish the rules and regulations of the department pertaining to such programs; (f)  To provide all other child welfare programs and services previously provided by the Department of Human Services or a division thereof; and (g)  Make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government may, from time to time, require, and comply with such provisions as the federal government may, from time to time, find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports. (8)  The Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services shall submit a copy of the federal Annual Progress and Services Report (APSR) to the Chair of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee, the Chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chair of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee, the Chair of the House Appropriations Committee, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor by December 1 of each year. (9)  (a)  The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall hire a Coordinator of Services for Victims of Human Trafficking and Commercial Sexual Exploitation within the Department of Child Protection Services whose duties shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (i)  To form specialized human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation assessment teams to respond on an as-needed basis to act as an emergency, separate and specialized response and assessment team to rapidly respond to the needs of children who are victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; (ii)  To identify victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; (iii)  To monitor, record and distribute federal human trafficking funds received by the Department of Child Protection Services; (iv)  To employ staff to investigate allegations of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; and (v)  To develop and coordinate services within the Department of Child Protection Services and with outside service providers for victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation. (b)  The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall develop standard operating procedures for the investigation, custody and services provided to alleged victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation. (c)  The Commissioner shall require two (2) hours of training regarding the subject of identifying, assessing, and providing comprehensive services to a child who has experienced or is alleged to have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking.  The training must be incorporated into the pre-service training requirements of all Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services family specialists, adoption specialists, licensure specialists, direct supervisors of family protection specialists, direct supervisors of adoption specialists, and direct supervisors of licensure specialists. (10)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.